Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.160

Suspension of assessments.

The members of the commission may, subject to approval by two-thirds of the voting members of the commission, suspend for a period not exceeding one crop year at a time all or part of the assessments on tree fruit subject to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1969 c 129 s 16.]